Missouri, session 2026, SB1606.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1295, to read as
follows:
376.1295. 1. For purposes of this section, the terms
"health carrier" and "health benefit plan" shall have the
same meanings given to the terms in section 376.1350.
2. Each health carrier or health benefit plan that
offers or issues health benefit plans that are delivered,
issued for delivery, continued or renewed in this state on
or after January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for the
treatment of obesity and severe obesity and the diseases and
ailments caused by obesity in persons between the ages of
two years old and twenty years old, including, but not
limited to, intensive health behavior and lifestyle
treatment, pharmacotherapy, and metabolic and bariatric
surgery. Any treatment required to be covered under this
section shall be in accordance with the standards set forth
by the Clinical Practice Guidelines on Obesity by the
American Academy of Pediatrics and the American Society for
Metabolic and Bariatric Surgery Pediatric Committee.

SB 1606 2
3. Health care services required by this section shall
not be subject to any greater deductible or co-payment than
any other health care service provided by the health benefit
plan.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
supplemental insurance policy, including a life care
contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only,
Medicare supplement policy, long-term care policy, short-
term major medical policy of six months' or less duration,
or any other supplemental policy as determined by the
director of the department of commerce and insurance.
✓